West Virginia, session 2026, HB4389.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS. §24-1-1e. Reports to be made to the Governor and Legislature The Public Service Commission, after thorough investigation, shall prepare and submit a report comparing and contrasting performance-based rate making regulations and West Virginia’s current cost-of-service rate making regulations to the Governor and to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance, on or before December 31, 2026. This report shall include an estimation of the effects of a performance-based rate making system on West Virginia regulated utilities and rates charged to ratepayers if enacted and promulgated.